Missouri, session 2026, SB1229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 376.1755 and 376.1758,
to read as follows:
376.1755. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Certified nurse midwife", the same meaning given
to the term in section 335.016;
(2) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Midwife", a certified nurse midwife or
professional midwife;
(5) "Professional midwife", any midwife allowed to
practice in this state in accordance with the provisions of
section 376.1753.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that
offers or issues health benefit plans that are delivered,
issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on
or after January 1, 2027, and that provide coverage for

SB 1229 2
maternity services shall provide coverage for health care
services provided by a midwife.
3. The coverage provided for in this section may be
subject to annual deductibles, coinsurance, and copayments.
A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section shall not differentiate between
services performed by a midwife within the midwife's lawful
scope of practice and services performed by a physician with
respect to copayments, annual deductible amounts, or
coinsurance percentages.
4. Whenever any health benefit plan subject to the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section provides for
reimbursement of any services that are within the lawful
scope of practice of certified nurse midwives and
professional midwives, the insured or other person entitled
to benefits under the health benefit plan shall be entitled
to reimbursement for the services, whether the services are
performed by a physician or a midwife.
5. Terminology in any health benefit plan subject to
the provisions of subsection 2 of this section that is
deemed discriminatory against certified nurse midwives,
professional midwives, or midwifery or that inhibits
reimbursement for midwifery services at the in-network rate
is void and unenforceable.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
supplemental insurance policy, including a life care
contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only,
Medicare supplement policy, long-term care policy, short-
term major medical policy of six months or less duration, or
any other supplemental policy as determined by the director
of the department of commerce and insurance.

SB 1229 3
376.1758. 1. For purposes of this section, the term
"doula" means an individual who has been trained to provide
physical, emotional, and educational support, but not
medical or midwifery care, to pregnant and birthing women
and their families before, during, and after childbirth.
2. The department of health and senior services shall
review and approve doula registration to allow for health
insurance reimbursement of doula services.
3. The department of health and senior services shall:
(1) Create the criteria for the doula registration
application;
(2) Review applications for doulas to register to
receive health insurance reimbursement in this state;
(3) Approve applications to designate registered doula
status;
(4) Notify applicants of approval or denial of doula
registration status; and
(5) Maintain a statewide registry of doulas approved
for health insurance reimbursement in this state.
4. Nothing in this section prohibits any person from
practicing as a doula in this state regardless of whether
the person is registered in accordance with the provisions
of this section.
5. The department of health and senior services shall
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the

SB 1229 4
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓